Utah statutes.
26-41-102.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Anaphylaxis" means a potentially life-threatening hypersensitivity to a
substance.
(a)  Symptoms of anaphylaxis may include shortness of breath, wheezing,
difficulty breathing, difficulty talking or swallowing, hives, itching,
swelling, shock, or asthma.
(b)  Causes of anaphylaxis may include insect sting, food allergy, drug
reaction, and exercise.
(2)  "Epinephrine auto-injector" means a disposable drug delivery system with
a spring-activated concealed needle that is designed for emergency
administration of epinephrine to provide rapid, convenient first-aid for
persons suffering a potentially fatal anaphylactic reaction.
(3)  "Qualified adult" means a person who:
(a)  is 18 years of age or older; and
(b)  has successfully completed the training program established in Section
26-41-104.
